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DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DI1LF-15

DTC PO 115/22[Engine Coolant Temperature Circuit
DTC PO 117/22[Engine Coolant Temperature Circuit Low
Input
DTC PO 118/22[Engine Coolant Temperature Circuit High
Input
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

A thermistor is built in the Engine Coolant Temperature (ECT) sensor and changes the resistance value ac-
cording to the engine coolant temperature.
The structure of the sensor and connection to the engine control ECU is the same the Intake Air Temperature

(IAT) sensor.

HINT:

Ifthe engine control ECU detectsthe DTC "P0O
tioninwhichthe ECT isassumedtobe 80

115/22,P0 117/220rP0 118/22”,itoperatesthefail
C (176 [F).

—-safefunc-

DTCNo.

Proceedto

DTC Detection Condition

Trouble Area

P0115/22

Step 1

Open or short in engine cool-
anttemperature sensor circuit
for 0.5 sec. (ECT equal to
-40° C (-40° F) ormorethan
140°C (284 °F))

(1 trip detectionlogic)

P0117/22

Step4

Short in engine coolant tem-
perature sensor circuit for 0.5
sec. (ECTismorethan

140°C (284 °F))

(1 trip detectionlogic)

P0118/22

Step2

Open in engine coolant tem-
perature sensor circuit for 0.5
sec. (ECTis -40°C (-40°F))
(1 trip detectionlogic)

* Openorshortinengine coolanttemperature sensor circuit
* Engine coolanttemperature sensor
« Engine control ECU

HINT:

AfterconfirmingDTC”P0 115,P0 117 or P 0118,”usethehand -heldtestertoconfirmthe engine coolanttem-
perature from the DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL.

Temperature Displayed Malfunction
-40°C (-40°F) Open circuit
140° C (284 °F) ormore Short circuit
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION

The ECT (Engine Coolant Temperature) sensor is used to monitor the engine coolant temperature. The ECT
sensor has a thermistor that varies its resistance depending on the temperature of the engine coolant. When
the coolant temperature is low, the resistance in the thermistor increases. When the temperature is high, the
resistance drops. The variations in resistance are reflected in the voltage output from the sensor.

The engine control ECU monitors the sensor voltage and uses this value to calculate the engine coolant
temperature. When the sensor output voltage deviates from the normal operating range, the engine control
ECU interprets this as a fault in the ECT sensor and sets a DTC.

Example:

Whenthe engine control ECU calculatesthatthe ECTislessthan -407C (-40CF),ormorethan 1407C
(2847F), andifeitherthe condition continues for 0.5 sec. or more, the engine control ECU willseta DTC.

This monitor runs 0.5 seconds after the ignition switch turned ON.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

. Readfreezeframedatausing the hand-heldtester. Freeze frame datarecordsthe engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, ifthe engine was warmed up or not, ifthe air —fuelratiowasleanor
rich, and other data from the time the malfunction occurred.
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1 Connect hand-held tester, and read value of engine coolant temperature.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

()  When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST /

ALL / COOLANT TEMP.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:
Same value as actual engine coolant temperature.
RESULT:
Temperature Displayed Proceed to
-40°C (-40°F) A
140° C (284°F) or more B
OK (Same as present temperature) C
HINT:

« If there is an open circuit, hand-held tester indicates -40° C (-40° F).
« If there is a short circuit, hand-held tester indicates 140° C (284° F) or more.

B > Go to step 4.

C > Check for intermittent problems

(See page DI-3).
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2 | Check for open in harness or engine control ECU.

Engine Coolant
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Temp. Sensor Engine Control ECU
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PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnectthe E2 engine coolanttemperature (ECT)

sensor connector.

(b) Connectterminals 1 and2ofthe engine coolanttempera-
ture sensor wire harness side connector.

(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(d) Whenusinghand -heldtester, enterthefollowing menus:
DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / COOL-
ANTTEMP.

CHECK:

Readthetemperaturevalueonthehand  -heldtester.

OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140°C (284 °F) ormore

OK>

Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK, re-
place engine coolant temperature sensor.
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w

Check for open in harness or engine control ECU.

Engine Coolant
Temp. Sensor Engine Control ECU
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PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the E2 engine coolant temperature sensor
connector.

(b) Connect terminals THW and E2 of the E7 engine control
ECU connector.

HINT:

Before checking, do a visual and contact pressure checks for

the engine control ECU connector.

(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.

(d) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus:
DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / COOL-
ANT TEMP.

CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the hand-held tester.

OK:
Temperature value: 140°C (284°F) or more

OK> Repair or replace harness or connector.

ECU (See page IN-20).

Confirm good connection at engine control
ECU. If OK, check and replace engine control

4 | Check for short in harness and engine control ECU.

Engine Coolant
Temp. Sensor Engine Control ECU
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PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the E2 engine coolant temperature sensor
connector.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(c) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus:
DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / COOL-
ANT TEMP.

CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the hand-held tester.

OK:
Temperature value: —40°C (-40°F)

OK> Replace engine coolant temperature sensor.
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5 [ Check for short in harness or engine control ECU.

_ PREPARATION:
52%'3?82?]‘;?? Engine Control ECU | (@)  Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
I o $THW (c) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus:
DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / COOL-
ANT TEMP.

.

g oo qE2 CHECK:
_|_ =
E&D

Read the temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:

[: :gﬁgwgﬁ Temperature value: —40°C (-40°F)
B :
Engine Control ECU Connector OK> Repair or replace harness or connector.
A19551 A19635

NG

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI-74).
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